Washington statutes.
RCW 11.44.025

Additional inventory and appraisement—Copy distribution.

Whenever any property of the estate not mentioned in the inventory and appraisement comes to the knowledge of a personal representative, the personal representative shall cause the property to be inventoried and appraised and shall make and verify by affidavit a true inventory and appraisement of the property within thirty days after the discovery thereof, unless a longer time shall be granted by the court, and shall provide a copy of the inventory and appraisement to every person who has properly requested a copy of the inventory and appraisement under RCW 11.44.015(2).

[ 1997 c 252 s 42; 1974 ex.s. c 117 s 48; 1965 c 145 s 11.44.025. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 100; RCW 11.44.060; RRS s 1470; prior: Code 1881 s 1453; 1873 p 281 s 138; 1854 p 277 s 64.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.

Application, construction—Severability—Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 117: See RCW 11.02.080 and notes following.